Maryland, session 2025, HB0827.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
3–306.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this article or the Public
Utilities Article, on application to the Public Service Commission for a certificate of public
convenience and necessity associated with power plant construction IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 7–207 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE, the Commission shall notify
immediately the Department [of Natural Resources] and the Department of the
Environment of the application.
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.

HOUSE BILL 827 3
(b) (1) (i) [Unless] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, UNLESS a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the
construction is first obtained from the Commission, a person may not begin construction in
the State of:
1. a generating station; or
2. a qualified generator lead line.
(ii) [If a person obtains Commission approval for construction under
§ 7–207.1 of this subtitle, the Commission shall exempt a person from the requirement to
obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity under this section.] A PERSON IS
NOT REQUIRED TO OBTAIN A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND
NECESSITY UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE PERSON OBTAINS:
1. COMMISSION APPROVAL FOR CONSTRUCTION UNDER
§ 7–207.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
2. A DISTRIBUTED GENERATION CERTIFICATE OF
PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(h) (1) A county or municipal corporation has the authority to approve or deny
any local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued
under this section.
(2) A county or municipal corporation shall approve or deny any local
permits required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under this
section:
(i) within a reasonable time; and
(ii) to the extent local laws are not preempted by State law, in
accordance with local laws.
(3) A county or municipal corporation may not condition the approval of a
local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under
this section on receipt of any of the following approvals for any aspect of a generating
station, an overhead transmission line, or a qualified lead line proposed to be constructed
under the certificate:
(i) a conditional use approval;
(ii) a special exception approval; or
(iii) a floating zone approval.

HOUSE BILL 827
7–207.1.
(c) (1) The Commission shall require a person that is exempted from the
requirement to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity UNDER §
7–207(B)(1)(II)1 OF THIS SUBTITLE to obtain approval from the Commission under this
section before the person may construct a generating station described in subsection (b) of
this section.
7–207.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DISTRIBUTED GENERATION CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY” OR “DGCPCN” MEANS A CERTIFICATE ISSUED BY
THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION THAT AUTHORIZES THE CONSTRUCTION
AND OPERATION OF A DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM.
(3) “DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM” MEANS A
COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM, AS DEFINED IN § 7–306.2 OF
THIS TITLE, THAT:
(I) WOULD BE REQUIRED TO OBTAIN A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE SYSTEM
DOES NOT OBTAIN A DGCPCN UNDER THIS SECTION;
(II) HAS A CAPACITY TO PRODUCE MORE THAN 2 MEGAWATTS
BUT NOT MORE THAN 5 MEGAWATTS OF ALTERNATING CURRENT; AND
(III) IS NOT LOCATED WITHIN A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION.
(4) “FOREST” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–1601 OF THE
NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE.
(5) “POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM” MEANS THE PROGRAM
WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 3
OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE.
(6) “STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS” MEANS THE
PREDETERMINED LICENSING CONDITIONS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER
THIS SECTION FOR THE CONSTRUCTION AND OPERATION OF A DISTRIBUTED SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT HAS BEEN ISSUED A DGCPCN UNDER THIS
SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 827 5
(7) “STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN REQUIREMENTS” MEANS THE
PREDETERMINED OBJECTIVE REQUIREMENTS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION
UNDER THIS SECTION FOR THE SITING AND DESIGN OF A DISTRIBUTED SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT HAS BEEN ISSUED A DGCPCN UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH
PROGRAM, AFTER GIVING NOTICE AND OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC COMMENT,
SHALL DEVELOP AND SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION PROPOSED STANDARD SITING
AND DESIGN REQUIREMENTS AND PROPOSED STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS
FOR THE ISSUANCE OF A DGCPCN.
(2) IN DEVELOPING THE PROPOSED STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN
REQUIREMENTS AND THE PROPOSED STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS, THE
POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) ACHIEVEMENT OF THE STATE’S CLIMATE AND RENEWABLE
ENERGY COMMITMENTS;
(II) REASONABLE SETBACKS AND LANDSCAPE SCREENING
REQUIREMENTS;
(III) ENVIRONMENTAL PRESERVATION, INCLUDING
PROHIBITIONS ON FOREST CLEARANCE EXCEPT WHERE NECESSARY TO:
1. REDUCE SOLAR PANEL SHADING NEAR THE
PERIMETER OF THE PROJECT SITE;
2. FACILITATE INTERCONNECTION INFRASTRUCTURE;
AND
3. ENSURE ADEQUATE SITE ACCESS;
(IV) STORMWATER MANAGEMENT, EROSION AND SEDIMENT
CONTROL, AND SITE STABILIZATION, ACCOUNTING FOR:
1. THE EFFECTS OF RUNOFF FROM SOLAR PANELS;
2. THE IMPACTS OF SOLAR PANELS ON SOIL DENSITY
AND COMPACTION; AND
3. THE IMPACTS OF SOLAR PANELS ON GROUND COVER
UNDER THE PANELS;

HOUSE BILL 827
(V) MINIMIZATION AND MITIGATION OF THE EFFECTS OF A
DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM ON HISTORIC SITES;
(VI) PUBLIC SAFETY;
(VII) INDUSTRY BEST PRACTICES; AND
(VIII) LICENSING CONDITIONS PREVIOUSLY ADOPTED BY THE
COMMISSION FOR SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS, INCLUDING
REQUIREMENTS RELATED TO DECOMMISSIONING.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO:
(I) IMPLEMENT STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN
REQUIREMENTS AND STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS FOR A DGCPCN;
(II) SPECIFY THE FORM OF THE APPLICATION FOR A
DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM TO RECEIVE A DGCPCN AND
ANY APPLICATION FEE; AND
(III) SPECIFY THE COMMISSION’S PROCEDURE FOR PROCESSING
AN APPLICATION FOR A DGCPCN.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER THE PROPOSED STANDARD
SITING AND DESIGN REQUIREMENTS AND THE PROPOSED STANDARD LICENSING
CONDITIONS DEVELOPED BY THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM IN
ADOPTING THE REGULATIONS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) (I) THE COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE POWER
PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM, MAY PERIODICALLY SOLICIT PUBLIC COMMENTS
REGARDING IMPROVEMENTS TO THE STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN
REQUIREMENTS AND STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS FOR A DGCPCN.
(II) THE PROCESS FOR SOLICITING PUBLIC COMMENTS UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE THE SAME AS THE PROCESS FOR
SOLICITING PUBLIC COMMENT REGARDING THE ADOPTION OF A REGULATION.
(4) (I) THE COMMISSION MAY SET AN APPLICATION FEE FOR A
DGCPCN APPLICATION AT AN AMOUNT THAT THE COMMISSION DETERMINES MAY
OFFSET THE ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF THE DGCPCN APPROVAL PROCESS.

HOUSE BILL 827 7
(II) THE ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE BASED ON AN ESTIMATE OF THE NUMBER OF DGCPCN
APPLICATIONS THAT WILL BE FILED WITH THE COMMISSION EACH YEAR.
(D) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT BEGIN CONSTRUCTION OF A DISTRIBUTED
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM UNLESS:
(I) A DGCPCN IS FIRST OBTAINED FROM THE COMMISSION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION; OR
(II) A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY
IS FIRST OBTAINED FROM THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–207 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(2) WHEN A PERSON SUBMITS AN APPLICATION FOR A DGCPCN TO
THE COMMISSION, THE PERSON SHALL SUBMIT A COPY OF THE APPLICATION TO:
(I) THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM; AND
(II) THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COUNTY WHERE THE
DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM IS PROPOSED TO BE LOCATED.
(E) (1) AFTER RECEIVING AN APPLICATION FOR A DGCPCN BUT
BEFORE A DETERMINATION IS MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE AN OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC COMMENT AND HOLD
A PUBLIC HEARING ON AN APPLICATION FOR A DGCPCN IN EACH COUNTY IN
WHICH ANY PORTION OF THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM IS PROPOSED TO BE LOCATED.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY HOLD THE PUBLIC HEARING VIRTUALLY
RATHER THAN IN PERSON IF THE COMMISSION PROVIDES A COMPARABLE
OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC COMMENT AND PARTICIPATION IN THE HEARING.
(F) (1) WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE DATE AN APPLICATION FOR A
DGCPCN IS FILED WITH THE COMMISSION, THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH
PROGRAM SHALL:
(I) DETERMINE WHETHER THE DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM SATISFIES THE STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE DGCPCN; AND
(II) NOTIFY THE COMMISSION IN WRITING AS TO THE
DETERMINATION MADE UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, INCLUDING HOW AN

HOUSE BILL 827
APPLICATION THAT IS DETERMINED NOT TO SATISFY THE STANDARD SITING AND
DESIGN REQUIREMENTS CAN CURE THE DEFICIENCY.
(2) IN MAKING A DETERMINATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM SHALL CONSIDER PUBLIC
COMMENTS RECEIVED BY THE COMMISSION.
(G) (1) WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH
PROGRAM MAKES ITS DETERMINATION UNDER SUBSECTION (F)(1) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL SCHEDULE A HEARING TO CONSIDER THE
APPLICATION FOR A DGCPCN.
(2) (I) AT THE HEARING UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER THE PROPOSED
DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM SATISFIES THE STANDARD
SITING AND DESIGN REQUIREMENTS.
(II) THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE A DGCPCN TO AN
APPLICANT TO CONSTRUCT A PROPOSED DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM SUBJECT TO THE STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS IF THE
COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE PROPOSED DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM SATISFIES THE STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN
REQUIREMENTS.
(III) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT ISSUE A DGCPCN TO AN
APPLICANT IF THE PROPOSED DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM
DOES NOT SATISFY EACH OF THE STANDARD SITING AND DESIGN REQUIREMENTS.
(3) IN MAKING A DETERMINATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY CONSIDER PUBLIC COMMENTS RECEIVED BY THE COMMISSION
UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(H) (1) A DGCPCN ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL REQUIRE THE PERSON CONSTRUCTING THE DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM TO OBTAIN THE FOLLOWING PERMITS AND APPROVALS FROM
THE COUNTY, MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, OR SOIL CONSERVATION DISTRICT IN
WHICH THE SYSTEM IS TO BE CONSTRUCTED:
(I) SITE PLAN APPROVAL;
(II) STORMWATER MANAGEMENT PLAN APPROVAL;
(III) EROSION AND SEDIMENT CONTROL PLAN APPROVAL;

HOUSE BILL 827 9
(IV) ALL APPLICABLE BUILDING AND ELECTRICAL PERMITS;
AND
(V) ANY ADDITIONAL LOCAL PERMIT REQUIRED BY THE
STANDARD LICENSING CONDITIONS.
(2) THE PROVISIONS OF § 7–207(H) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL APPLY
TO ANY PERMITS AND APPROVALS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(I) A DGCPCN ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION HAS
THE SAME FORCE AND EFFECT AS A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND
NECESSITY ISSUED UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That a county may not enact zoning
laws or adopt regulations that restrict or prohibit the construction or operation of energy
generating systems or facilities that are ground–mounted solar with a capacity to produce
up to 2 megawatts of alternating current.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) There is a Small Solar Siting Workgroup.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) one representative of the Maryland Energy Administration, designated
by the Director of the Administration;
(4) one representative of the Department of Natural Resources, designated
by the Secretary of Natural Resources;
(5) one representative of the Department of the Environment, designated
by the Secretary of the Environment;
(6) one representative of the Department of Agriculture, designated by the
Secretary of Agriculture;
(7) one representative of the Department of Planning, designated by the
Secretary of Planning;

HOUSE BILL 827
(8) one representative of the Chesapeake Solar and Storage Solar
Association, designated by the President of the Association;
(9) one representative of the Solar Energy Industries Association,
designated by the President of the Association;
(10) one representative of the Coalition for Community Solar Access,
designated by the President of the Coalition;
(11) one representative of the Maryland Association of Counties, designated
by the President of the Association;
(12) one representative of the Maryland Farm Bureau, designated by the
President of the Bureau;
(13) one representative of Forever Maryland, designated by the Executive
Director of Forever Maryland;
(14) one representative of the League of Conservation Voters, designated by
the Chair of the Board of Directors of the League;
(15) one representative of the Chesapeake Climate Action Network,
designated by the Executive Director of the Network; and
(16) one representative of the Maryland Sierra Club, designated by the
Director of the Club.
(c) The representative of the Maryland Energy Administration shall serve as
chair of the Workgroup.
(d) The Maryland Energy Administration shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall review, determine, and make recommendations
regarding:
(1) best practices for solar energy generating systems with capacities of up
to 2 megawatts of alternating current, including:
(i) the possibility of statewide setback and screening requirements;

HOUSE BILL 827 11
(ii) whether there should be additional State or local incentives for
the development of solar energy generating systems on brownfields, parking lots, and other
non–agriculturally–zoned land;
(iii) whether there should be additional State or local incentives for
agrivoltaics development; and
(iv) what other forms of standardization should apply to these solar
energy generating systems; and
(2) the establishment of a statewide model policy for solar energy
generating systems with capacities of up to 2 megawatts of alternating current.
(g) On or before December 1, 2025, the Workgroup shall submit an interim report
of its initial findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(h) On or before December 1, 2026, the Workgroup shall submit a final report of
its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 1 and 2 of this Act
may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or application to the construction
or modification of any solar energy generating system for which a certificate of public
convenience and necessity or other required approval was obtained before the effective date
of the regulations adopted by the Public Service Commission under § 7–207.4(c) of the
Public Utilities Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that nothing in Section 2 or 3 of this Act be construed to abrogate, modify, or
limit the holding of the Supreme Court of Maryland in Board of County Commissioners of
Washington County, Maryland v. Perennial Solar, LLC, 464 Md. 610 (2019).
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. Sections 2 and 3 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the
end of June 30, 2027, Sections 2 and 3 of this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.